Idaho, session 2025, S1054.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 22-2912, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-2912. BEAN COMMISSION CREATED. (1) There is hereby created and
established in the department of self-governing agencies the Idaho bean
commission, hereinafter called the commission. It shall be composed of
eight (8) men or women engaged in the bean industry. The commission shall
be appointed by the governor, and each member must have been a resident of
the state of Idaho for a period of three (3) years immediately prior to his
appointment, shall have had active experience in growing, processing or
shipping of beans produced in the state of Idaho, and at least four (4) mem-
bers of the commission shall be growers actually engaged in production of
beans, but who are not handlers, dealers or processors. One (1) grower mem-
ber of the commission shall be appointed from each of the districts provided
for by this section. The four (4) remaining members of the commission may be
engaged in the processing or shipping of beans, at least one (1) of whom must
be engaged in the processing or shipping of snap bean seed. The processor
or shipper members of the commission shall be appointed at large, keeping in
mind insofar as possible geographic locations representative of the Idaho
bean industry. The qualifications for membership on the commission shall
continue throughout the respective terms of office of the commissioners.
Upon recommendation of organizations of producers and shippers of beans, one
(1) grower commissioner shall be appointed from district No. 1, which dis-
trict shall be composed of the following counties: Adams, Boundary, Bonner,
Kootenai, Benewah, Shoshone, Latah, Nez Perce, Clearwater, Lewis, Idaho,
Washington, Payette, Gem, Canyon and Ada; one (1) grower commissioner shall
be appointed from district No. 2, which district shall be composed of the
following counties: Valley, Lemhi, Custer, Boise, Twin Falls, Owyhee and
Elmore; one (1) grower commissioner shall be appointed from district No. 3,
which district shall be composed of the following counties: Cassia, Oneida,
Power, Bannock, Caribou, Bear Lake, Franklin and Minidoka; one (1) grower
commissioner shall be appointed from district No. 4, which district shall
be composed of the following counties: Camas, Blaine, Gooding, Lincoln,


Jerome, Bingham, Bonneville, Butte, Jefferson, Madison, Teton, Fremont
and Clark. Commencing on July 1, 1999, the governor shall appoint two (2)
members for a one (1) year term, two (2) members for a two (2) year term, two
(2) members for a three (3) year term, and two (2) members for a four (4) year
term. Thereafter, the governor shall appoint commissioners as their terms
expire. Each commissioner shall serve for a term of four (4) years. Each
commissioner shall hold office until his successor has been appointed.
(2) A simple majority of members of the commission shall constitute a
quorum for the transaction of business and for carrying out the duties of the
commission. All commissioners shall take an oath of office before commenc-
ing their duties.
(3) Each member of the commission shall be compensated as provided by
section 59-509(l), Idaho Code, provided however, that compensation paid to
members of the commission on and after January 1, 1998, shall not be consid-
ered salary as defined in section 59-1302, Idaho Code.
SECTION 2. That Section 22-2914, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-2914. DEFINITIONS. As used in this act chapter:
(a) (1) The term "commission" means the Idaho bean commission.
(b) (2) The term "person" means an individual, partnership, organiza-
tion, corporation, association, and/or any other business unit.
(c) (3) The term "beans" means all dry and garden beans sold or intended
for human consumption or for seed purposes grown in the state of Idaho.
(d) (4) "Shipment" of beans means loading beans within the state of
Idaho in a car, bulk truck, or other conveyance, to be transported for sale
or otherwise.
(e) (5) The term "dealer" means and includes any person engaged in the
business of buying, receiving, cleaning, or selling beans for profit or re-
muneration, in this state or another state.
(f) (6) The term "handler" means any person handling beans in the pri-
mary channels of trade.
(g) (7) The term "grower" means the actual producer of any beans defined
in this act chapter.
(h) (8) "Delivery" means the placing of beans into primary channels of
trade when any such beans are sold or delivered for shipment or delivered for
canning or processing into by-products.
(i) (9) The term "hundredweight" means each one hundred (100) pound or
combination of packages making a one hundred (100) pound unit of any shipment
of beans based on invoice and/or bill of lading records.
SECTION 3. That Section 22-2921, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
22-2921. TAX LEVY. (1) There is hereby levied and imposed a tax
of twelve cents (12¢) no less than sixteen cents (16¢) but no more than
twenty-four cents (24¢) per hundredweight on beans covered by this act
chapter, which tax shall be due on or before the time when such beans are
first handled in the primary channels of trade and shall be paid at such time
or times as the commission may by rule or regulation prescribe, but not later


than the 15th day of the month next succeeding the three (3) month period in
which such beans were handled in the primary channels of trade. The commis-
sion shall designate the quarters (three (3) month periods) for the purpose
of collection of this tax.
(2) The person first introducing beans into primary channels of trade
shall be responsible for payment of the tax. If such person is the dealer
or shipper handling beans grown by another he may charge against or recover
from the grower of such beans eight cents (8¢) half of the cost thereof, but
he shall remain liable for and pay four cents (4¢) the remaining half of the
cost thereof. However, if such person is the dealer or handler and is only
cleaning the beans for the grower, he shall charge against or recover from
the grower the entire tax of twelve cents (12¢) per hundredweight. imposed
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
(3) The decision whether to adjust the amount of the tax to be levied and
the time for which the adjusted levy shall be in effect shall require the vote
of a simple majority or a quorum of the commission members.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.